North Dakota, session 69, SB2309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 20.1-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. An individual may not hunt, kill, take, or attempt to take any big game without having the
appropriate big game hunting license and a locking seal bearing a number corresponding to
the number of the big game hunting license or stamp. The locking seal must be issued as an
integral part of the big game hunting license. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
an individual may not apply for or be issued a big game hunting license unless that individual's
fourteenth or subsequent birthday occurs in the same year as the respective big game hunting
season. This age limitation does not apply to applicants for big game licenses for hunting by
bow and arrow. Each violation of this section is a distinct and separate offense. The following
provisions govern youth deer and antelope hunting:
a. An individual whose eleventh, twelfth, or thirteenth birthday occurs in the same year as a
youth deer hunting season is entitled to receive a;
(1) A statewide white-tailed antlerless deer permit; or
(2) An antlerless deer permit, as determined by the governor by proclamation.
b. An individual whose twelfth or thirteenth birthday occurs in the same year as an antelope
hunting season is entitled to apply for an antelope permit for that season.
c. An individual hunting under subdivision a or b must be accompanied by the individual's
parent, guardian, or other individual authorized by the individual's parent or guardian. As
used in this section, "accompanied" means to stay within a distance that permits
uninterrupted visual contact and unaided verbal communication.

S. B. NO. 2309 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2309.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State